Illinois, session 104th, HB2428.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-30.11 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5-30.11)7    Sec. 5-30.11. Treatment of autism spectrum disorder. 8    (a) Treatment of autism spectrum disorder through applied 9behavior analysis shall be covered under the medical 10assistance program under this Article for children with a 11diagnosis of autism spectrum disorder when (1) ordered by a 12physician licensed to practice medicine in all its branches or 13a psychologist licensed by the Department of Financial and 14Professional Regulation and (2) evaluated by a behavior 15analyst as recognized by the Department or licensed by the 16Department of Financial and Professional Regulation to 17practice applied behavior analysis in this State. Such 18coverage may be limited to age ranges based on evidence-based 19best practices. Appropriate State plan amendments as well as 20rules regarding provision of services and providers will be 21submitted by September 1, 2019. Pursuant to the flexibilities 22allowed by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 23Services to Illinois under the Medical Assistance Program, the   HB2428- 2 -LRB104 08118 KTG 18164 b1Department shall enroll and reimburse qualified staff to 2perform applied behavior analysis services in advance of 3Illinois licensure activities performed by the Department of 4Financial and Professional Regulation. These services shall be 5covered if they are provided in a home or community setting or 6in an office-based setting. The Department may conduct annual 7on-site reviews of the services authorized under this Section. 8Provider enrollment shall occur no later than September 1, 92023. 10    (b) On January 1, 2026 the reimbursement rates for applied 11behavior analysis services covered under this Section shall be 12increased by 3.5% above the reimbursement rates in effect on 13December 31, 2025. 14(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-953, eff. 5-27-22; 15103-102, eff. 7-1-23.)